Utah statutes.
16-11-6.   Purpose of professional corporation -- Power to own property and
invest funds.
A professional corporation may be organized pursuant to the provisions of this
act only for the purpose of rendering one specific type of professional
service and services ancillary thereto and shall not engage in any business
other than rendering the professional service which it was organized to render
and services ancillary thereto; provided, however, that a professional
corporation may own real and personal property necessary or appropriate for
rendering the type of professional service it was organized to render and may
invest its funds in real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds and any other type
of investments.
